Utah statutes.
63K-5-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Claim" has the same definition as in the following sections, as applicable:

(a)  Section 6-902, Idaho Code; or

(b)  Section 63G-7-102, Utah Code Annotated.

(2)  "Emergency":

(a)  means a situation where it reasonably appears that the life or safety of a person is at peril or real or personal property is at risk of destruction or loss;

(b)  includes disasters, fires, persons who are lost or missing, boats that are sinking or are in danger of sinking, medical situations where care is needed, and transportation of persons by ambulance; and

(c)  is not limited in duration to a discrete period of time.

(3) (a)  "Emergency responder" means a person whose duties include providing services to protect property or the life or safety of any person and who is:

(i)  employed by a governmental entity of another state;

(ii)  temporarily employed by a governmental entity; or

(iii)  a volunteer who is serving at the request of a governmental entity.

(b)  "Emergency responder" includes:

(i)  law enforcement officers, fire fighters, search and rescue personnel, emergency medical technicians, ambulance personnel, Department of Natural Resources employees, park rangers, and volunteers participating in search and rescue operations; and

(ii)  persons and parties identified in the interstate mutual aid agreement.

(4)  "Interstate mutual aid agreement" means an agreement that establishes procedures for claims against an out-of-state emergency responder, and that:

(a)  is established reciprocally between the Utah Highway Patrol and the Idaho State Police;

(b)  is on file with the Utah Highway Patrol; and

(c)  has a duration of one year from the time the agreement is entered into by Utah and Idaho.

